California statutes. Public Resources Code
(a) Any operator of a solid waste landfill that pays a fee pursuant to this chapter may impose on its users an administrative fee of not more than 5 percent of the fees paid to the State Board of Equalization during the previous quarter pursuant to Section 48000.

(b) Administrative fees imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall reflect, to the extent feasible, the actual costs of collecting and accounting for fees paid to the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1355, Sec. 57.   Effective September 27, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.1. State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund [48010. - 48013.]

48010.

(a) (1) An owner of a landfill for which evidence of financial ability is maintained pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 2 of Part 4, whose landfill is operating on January 1, 2012, and that elects to participate in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund pursuant to this article, shall submit written notice to the Department of
 Resources Recycling and Recovery on or before January 1, 2012.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), an owner of multiple landfills that elects to participate in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund is required to submit written notice that includes all of the owner’s operating landfills and all other landfills in which that owner has in common ownership.

(3) A landfill with multiple owners may participate only if all owners of that landfill elect to participate. Participation of a landfill with multiple owners shall not obligate a partial owner of that landfill to include any other landfill at which that owner has full or partial ownership.

(4) The Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall provide to the state board the name and address, and any other information necessary
 to administer and collect the fee imposed pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 48000, of every owner of a landfill electing to participate in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund on or before February 29, 2012.

(b) If an operator that is operating a landfill on January 1, 2012, submits a written notification to the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery that it elects to participate after the trust fund fee goes into effect, the operator shall pay all trust fund fees applicable from July 1, 2012, and a 5-percent penalty before being allowed to participate.

(c) For new landfills that receive a solid waste facility permit after January 1, 2012, the owner’s election to participate in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund shall be submitted in writing to the Department of Resources Recycling and
 Recovery before the department concurs in the issuance of the permit pursuant to Section 44009.

(d) All elections to participate made by landfill owners pursuant to this section are final, binding, and irrevocable for those owners and their successors and assignees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 417, Sec. 2.   (AB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48011.

(a) For the purposes of this article, “solid waste landfill” means a disposal site that is required to maintain evidence of financial ability pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 2 of Part 4.

(b) The board may expend money in the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund to pay for corrective action and postclosure activities that have not been performed by
 the owner or operator of a solid waste landfill, upon a determination by the board that all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The solid waste landfill owner or operator has failed to comply with a final enforcement order issued by the enforcement agency, the regional water board, or the board.

(2) The financial assurance mechanisms are inadequate to pay for the required corrective action or postclosure maintenance activities or both that action and those activities.

(3) The solid waste landfill was operating pursuant to a valid solid waste facilities permit on or after January 1, 1988, when the state’s requirements for solid waste landfill financial assurances went into effect as a result of Assembly Bill 2448 of the 1987–88 Regular Session, and is required to have financial assurances pursuant to Article 4
 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 2 of Part 4.

(4) The board has first used and exhausted all immediately available financial assurance mechanisms provided by the operator.

(5) The solid waste landfill owner and operator are otherwise unable or unwilling to pay, in a timely manner, for the required corrective action or postclosure maintenance activities or both that action and those activities.

(c) The board may adopt regulations, if necessary, setting forth additional criteria for making expenditures from the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code, a contract entered into by the board for the purposes of this article is not subject to approval by the
 Department of General Services.

(e) No liability or obligation is imposed on the state under this article, and the board shall not incur any obligation beyond the extent to which money is expended from the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund pursuant to this article.

(f) The board shall, to the maximum extent feasible, recover from the landfill owner or operator the amount of money expended from the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund, including a reasonable amount for any board contract administration costs and an amount equal to the interest that would have been earned on the expended funds. The board shall deposit all funds recovered pursuant to an action authorized by this section into the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund.

(g) The
 amount of any cost incurred by the board pursuant to this section is recoverable from the landfill owner or operator in a civil action brought by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 40432.

(h) The board may, consistent with Section 48023.5, impose a lien on the owner’s or operator’s assets or real property as an additional remedy to recover funds from the operator for expenditures from the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 318, Sec. 4.   (AB 274)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48012.

After January 1, 2016, as part of the annual report required pursuant to Section 40507, the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery shall report on expenditures from the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust Fund, the status of cost recovery actions, and any recommended statutory changes that are necessary to ensure adequate resources are available to carry out the purposes of the State Solid Waste Postclosure and Corrective Action Trust
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   (AB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48013.

Except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 48010, an owner of multiple landfills for which evidence of financial ability is maintained pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 43600) of Chapter 2 of Part 4 and whose landfills are operating on January 1, 2012, shall include all other landfills in which that owner has in common ownership in the letter of participation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 417, Sec. 4.   (AB 1004)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Solid Waste Disposal and Codisposal Site Cleanup Program [48020. - 48028.]

48020.

(a) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meaning:

(1) “Codisposal site” means a hazardous substance release site listed pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 78760) of Chapter 4 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code, where the disposal of hazardous substances, hazardous waste, and solid waste has occurred.

(2) “Trust fund” means the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund created pursuant to Section 48027.

(b) The board shall, on January 1, 1994, initiate a program for the cleanup of solid waste disposal sites and for the cleanup of
 solid waste at codisposal sites where the responsible party either cannot be identified or is unable or unwilling to pay for timely remediation, and where cleanup is needed to protect public health and safety or the environment.

(c) The board shall not expend more than 5 percent of the funds appropriated for the purpose of the program by a statute other than the Budget Act to administer that program, unless a different amount is otherwise appropriated to administer the program in the annual Budget Act. If a different amount is appropriated to administer the program in the annual Budget Act, it shall be set forth in a separate line item. All remaining funds appropriated for purposes of the program shall be expended on direct cleanup pursuant to subdivision (b) or emergency actions at solid waste facilities, disposal sites, sites involving solid waste handling, and for solid waste at codisposal sites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 121.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

48021.

(a) In prioritizing the sites for cleanup pursuant to Section 48020, the board shall consider the degree of risk to public health and safety and the environment posed by conditions at a site, the ability of the site owner to clean up the site without monetary assistance, the ability of the board to clean up the site adequately with available funds, maximizing the use of available funds, and other factors as determined by the board.

(b) (1) In administering the program authorized by Section 48020, the board may expend funds directly for cleanup, provide loans to parties who demonstrate the ability to repay state funds, and provide partial grants to public entities, to assist in site cleanup.

(2) The board may expend funds directly for the cleanup of a publicly owned site only if the board determines that the public entity lacks resources or expertise to timely manage the cleanup itself.

(3) In addition to the criteria specified in subdivision (a), in considering partial grants that provide greater than 50 percent of the funds directly for cleanup, the board shall consider the amount of contributions of moneys or in-kind services from the applicant; the availability of other appropriate funding sources to remediate the site; the degree of public benefit; the presence of innovative and cost-effective programs to abate or prevent solid waste problems to be addressed by the grants; and other factors as determined by the board.

(c) (1) In addition to the expenditures specified in subdivision (b), the board may expend a portion of the funds appropriated for the program to abate illegal disposal sites.

(2) For the purposes of this subdivision, the board may provide grants to public entities.

(3) Where funds are provided by the board to address illegal disposal sites within a jurisdiction, the local enforcement agency shall provide ongoing enforcement to prevent recurring illegal disposal at the site.

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, an activity to remove or abate solid waste disposed into a municipal storm sewer is eligible to receive a partial grant, if the grant is used for solid waste cleanup, solid waste abatement, or any other activity that mitigates the impact of solid waste, and an ongoing program is established to prevent recurring solid waste disposal into the municipal storm sewer.

(d) In developing and implementing the program, the board shall consult with certified local enforcement agencies and the regional water boards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 762, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

48022.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Pursuant to the legal framework and definitions pertaining to solid waste contained in this division, the board and the local enforcement agencies have general authority and responsibility for responding to environmental conditions at solid waste disposal sites to ensure protection of the public health and safety and the environment.

(b) The definitions of “solid waste,” “solid waste disposal,” and “solid waste landfill” establish some of the parameters for the general authority and responsibility of the board and the local enforcement agencies.

(c) The Solid Waste Disposal and Codisposal Site Cleanup Program established under this article establishes a mechanism for funding the cleanup of solid waste disposal sites and the solid waste at codisposal sites under specified conditions and circumstances.

(d) A burn dump site is a solid waste disposal site and, as such, is a site that is eligible for funding pursuant to the program, provided all other criteria for program eligibility are met.

(e) Pursuant to the Health and Safety Code, the Department of Toxic Substances Control has general jurisdiction, authority, and responsibility regarding hazardous substance release sites.

(f) Pursuant to the Water Code, the State Water Resources Control Board and the regional water quality control boards have general jurisdiction, authority, and responsibility regarding protection of the waters of the state, including, but not limited to, solid waste and hazardous waste discharges.

(g) Most burn dump sites impact multiple media. Burn dump sites usually contain hazardous substances and, therefore, most can be characterized generally as hazardous substance release sites. Burn dump sites also contain predominantly solid waste and, therefore, can be characterized generally as solid waste disposal sites. Some burn dump sites impact, or have the potential to impact, waters of the state.

(h) Burn dump sites are presumed to be solid waste disposal sites, subject to the general authority and responsibility of the board and the local enforcement agencies. In addition to this general presumption, it is the intent of the Legislature to require that the procedures set forth in Section 48022.5 be followed to ensure that hazardous substances and hazardous wastes at burn dump sites are adequately characterized and safely managed and remediated in consultation with, or under the direct oversight of, the department or the appropriate regional water quality control board, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 589, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48022.5.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(1) “Burn dump site” means a solid waste disposal site that meets all of the following conditions:

(A) Was operated prior to 1972.

(B) Is closed.

(C) Prior to closure, was a site where open burning was conducted.

(2) “Department” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(3) “Regional board” means a California regional water quality control board.

(4) “Remediation oversight agency” means the entity responsible for environmental oversight on a burn dump site remediation project.

(5) “Sensitive land use” means either of the following:

(A) Use for residences, schools, day care facilities, hospitals and hospices, and other facilities or structures that have a high density of occupation on a daily basis.

(B) Use as a park, golf course, or any other, similar open-space area that is made available for public use, when the park, golf course, or open-space area has a potential for human exposure to hazardous substances.

(b) On or before June 30, 2003, the department, in consultation with the board and the State Water Resources Control Board, shall develop protocols to be utilized by the board and the local enforcement agencies for site investigation and characterization of hazardous substances at burn dump sites.

(1) The protocols shall include, but need not be limited to, both of the following items:

(A) Sampling and analysis protocols to be utilized by the board and the local enforcement agencies for site investigation and characterization of hazardous substances at burn dump sites.

(B) Appropriate abatement measures for nonsensitive land uses.

(2) In addition, the protocols may include either or both of the following items:

(A) Cleanup guidelines, levels, or thresholds for one or more typical constituents of concern based on nonsensitive land uses.

(B) Specifications for confirmation sampling on partial and complete clean-closed sites.

(c) Whenever the board receives an application for funding under this article for a burn dump site, the board shall use the protocols developed by the department under subdivision (b) to investigate and characterize hazardous substances at the site.

(d) Once sufficient site information is available, the board shall notify the department and the appropriate regional board of the board’s interest in providing funding and remediation oversight for the site.

(e) For a nonsensitive land use site, the board shall proceed as the remediation oversight agency, following the notification required under subdivision (d), unless the department or regional board requests a site consultation meeting under subdivision (g).

(f) For an existing or proposed sensitive land use site, the board shall request a site consultation meeting under subdivision (g).

(g) For sites with existing or proposed sensitive land uses or water quality impacts, or where otherwise requested by the department or a regional board, the board, the department, the State Water Resources Control Board, and the appropriate regional board shall hold a site consultation meeting to determine which agency will provide remediation oversight. If, following a review of the site information, the department or a regional board requests to provide remediation oversight, that request shall be granted. If the department or a regional board does not request to provide remediation oversight, remediation oversight of the site shall remain with the board. In cases where the board requested the meeting, the determination of remediation oversight agency shall be made within 30 days of the board’s request for the meeting.

(h) The board may require the imposition of an environmental restriction on any burn dump site where solid waste or residuals from the burning of solid waste is left in place. The environmental restriction shall meet the requirements described in Section 1471 of the Civil Code, and the restrictions shall run with the land.

(i) On or before March 30, 2003, the board and the department shall enter into an agreement relating to the funding of any activities of the department appropriately conducted pursuant to this section.

(j) Nothing in this section is intended to limit the authority of the board, the department, the State Water Resources Control Board, or a regional board pursuant to other provisions of law.

(k) Nothing in this section is intended to preclude any qualifying entity from applying for and receiving funding assistance under any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 589, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48023.

(a) If the board expends any funds pursuant to this article, the board shall, to the extent feasible, seek repayment from responsible parties in an amount equal to the amount expended, a reasonable amount for the board’s cost of contract administration, and an amount equal to the interest that would have been earned on the expended funds.

(b) In implementing this article, the board is vested, in addition to its other powers, with all the powers of an enforcement agency under this division.

(c) The amount of any cost incurred by the board pursuant to this article shall be recoverable from responsible parties in a civil action brought by the board or, upon the request of the board, by the Attorney General pursuant to Section 40432.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 216.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

48023.5.

(a) In addition to the remedies authorized under Section 48023, any costs or damages incurred under this article by the board constitute a lien upon the real property owned by any responsible party that is subject to the remedial action. The lien shall attach regardless of whether the responsible party is insolvent. A lien imposed under this section shall arise at the time costs are first incurred by the board with respect to a remedial action at the site.

(b) A lien established under this section shall be subject to the notice and hearing procedures required by due process of the law. Prior to imposing the lien, the board shall send the property owner via certified mail a “Notice of Intent to Place A Lien” letter. This letter shall provide that the owner, within 14 calendar days from the date of receipt of the letter, may object to the imposition of the lien either in writing or through an informal proceeding before a neutral official. This neutral official shall be the board’s executive director or his or her designee, who may not have had any prior involvement with the site. The issue before the neutral official shall be whether the board has a reasonable basis for its determination that the statutory elements for lien placement under this section are satisfied. During this proceeding the property owner may present information or submit documents, or both, to establish that the board should not place a lien as proposed. The neutral official shall assure that a record of the proceeding is made, and shall issue a written decision. The decision shall state whether the property owner has established any issue of fact or law to alter the board’s intention to file a lien, and the basis for the decision.

(c) The board may not be considered a responsible party for a remediated site merely because a lien is imposed under this section.

(d) A lien imposed under this section shall continue until the liability for the costs or damages incurred under this article, or a judgment against the responsible party, is satisfied. However, if it is determined by a court that the judgment against the responsible party will not be satisfied, the board may exercise its rights under the lien.

(e) A lien imposed under this section shall have the force and effect of, and the priority of, a judgment lien upon its recordation in the county in which the property subject to the lien is located. The lien shall contain a legal description of the real property that is subject to, or affected by, the remedial action, the assessor’s parcel number, and the name of the owner of record, as shown on the latest equalized assessment roll.

(f) All funds recovered under this section on behalf of the board’s solid waste disposal and codisposal site cleanup program shall be deposited in the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund established under Section 48027.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 625, Sec. 16.   Effective September 17, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

48024.

Any contract entered into by the board pursuant to Section 48021 or 48022 is exempt from approval by the Department of General Services pursuant to Section 10295 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

48025.

The board may adopt regulations for the implementation of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

48026.

All expenses which are incurred by the board in carrying out this article shall be payable solely from the trust fund. No liability or obligation is imposed upon the state pursuant to this part, and the board shall not incur a liability or obligation beyond the extent to which money is provided in the trust fund for the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 655, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

48027.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that effective response to cleanup at solid waste disposal and codisposal sites requires that the state have sufficient funds available in the trust fund created pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that the maintenance of the trust fund is of the utmost importance to the state and that it is essential that, except as described in subdivision (g), any moneys in the trust fund be used solely for the purposes authorized in this article and not be used, loaned, or transferred for any other purpose.

(b) The Solid
 Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the moneys in the trust fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board for expenditure, without regard to fiscal years, for the purposes of this article.

(c) The following moneys shall be deposited into the trust fund:

(1) Funds appropriated by the Legislature from the Integrated Waste Management Account to the board for solid waste disposal or codisposal site cleanup.

(2) Any interest earned on the moneys in the trust fund.

(3) Any cost recoveries from responsible parties for solid waste disposal or codisposal site cleanup and loan repayments pursuant to this article.

(d) If this article is repealed, the trust fund shall be dissolved and all moneys in the fund shall be distributed to solid waste landfill operators who have paid into the trust fund during the effective life of the trust fund.

(e) Any trust fund distributions received by solid waste landfill operators pursuant to subdivision (c) may be used for only any of the following activities, as related to solid waste landfills:

(1) Solid waste landfill closure and postclosure maintenance operations.

(2) Implementation of Part 258 (commencing with Section 258.1) of Chapter I of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(3) Corrective actions at the solid waste landfill.

(f) The balance in the trust fund each July 1 shall not exceed thirty million dollars ($30,000,000).

(g) Notwithstanding any other law, the Controller may use the moneys in the Solid Waste Disposal Site Cleanup Trust Fund for loans to the General Fund as provided in Sections 16310 and 16381 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 198.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

48028.

Any funds appropriated for the purpose of the program that are not expended shall remain in the trust fund for future expenditure by the board for the purposes of this article or until this article is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 496, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Grant Program [48100. - 48106.]

48100.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that illegal disposal of solid waste on property owned by innocent parties is a longstanding problem needing attention and that grants provided under this chapter will support the cleanup of farm and ranch property.

(b) The board shall establish a farm and ranch solid waste cleanup and abatement grant program for the purposes of cleaning up and abating the effects of illegally disposed solid waste pursuant to this chapter.

(c) (1) The Farm and Ranch Solid Waste Cleanup and Abatement Account is hereby created in the General Fund and may be expended by the board, upon appropriation by the
 Legislature in the annual Budget Act, for the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The following funds shall be deposited into the account:

(A) Money appropriated by the Legislature from the Integrated Waste Management Fund or the California Used Oil Recycling Fund to the board for the grant program, or from the California Tire Recycling Management Fund to the board for the purposes set forth in paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section 42889.

(B) Notwithstanding Section 16475 of the Government Code, any interest earned on the money in the account.

(3) The board may expend the money in the account for both of the following purposes:

(A) To pay the costs of implementing this chapter, which
 costs shall not exceed 7 percent of the funds available for the grant program.

(B) To make payments for grants authorized by this chapter.

(4) Upon authorization by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act, the sum of all funds transferred into the account from other funds or accounts shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) annually.

(5) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 48653 and notwithstanding any other provision of law, the grant program shall be funded from the following funds:

(A) The Integrated Waste Management Fund.

(B) The California Tire Recycling Management Fund, for the purposes set forth in paragraph (10) of subdivision (b) of Section
 42889.

(C) The California Used Oil Recycling Fund.

(d) For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Native American tribe” has the same meaning as tribe, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44201.

(2) “Public entity” means a city, county, or resource conservation district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 353, Sec. 3.   (SB 546)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

48101.

(a) The grant program shall be established to make grants available to public entities and Native American tribes for the purposes described in subdivision (b) of Section 48100 in an amount not to exceed the sum of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) per year for any single public entity or Native American tribe, and not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for any single cleanup or abatement project. A Native American tribe or public entity may not expend more than 7 percent of the grant for administrative costs.

(b) The board shall give priority to the provision of grants to public entities and Native American tribes that have established innovative and cost-effective programs designed to discourage the illegal disposal of solid waste and to encourage the proper disposal of solid waste in permitted solid waste disposal facilities.

(c) A grant agreement between the board and a public entity or Native American tribe may provide for, but is not limited to, all of the following provisions:

(1) Site-specific cleanup and removal of solid waste that is illegally disposed on farm or ranch property.

(2) Comprehensive, ongoing enforcement programs for the cleanup and removal of solid waste that is illegally disposed of on farm or ranch property.

(3) Waiver of tipping fees or other solid waste fees at permitted solid waste facilities for solid waste that was illegally disposed of on farm or ranch property.

(d) On and after the adoption of grant program regulations by the board, any fines levied on, or abatement orders issued against, a farm or ranch owner by the local enforcement agency or other local agency as the result of solid waste disposed of on the owner’s farm or ranch property, regarding which the owner has made application to a public entity or Native American tribe for a grant under this chapter, shall be stayed, upon the owner’s written request to the local enforcement agency or other local agency, if (1) the local agency makes a decision that the property owner was not responsible for the dumping or (2) the property owner has filed a written appeal of the local agency’s decision to the board and the board’s decision on the matter is pending.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 628, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48102.

No farm or ranch property is eligible for a grant pursuant to this chapter if it is determined by the public entity or Native American tribe that the owner was responsible for the illegal disposal of the solid waste.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 628, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48103.

(a) The board shall adopt regulations to implement this chapter.

(b) The regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall include criteria for grant eligibility and shall establish a process that is open and accessible to the public under which grant applications may be reviewed, ranked, and awarded. The regulations shall also develop a process for a farm or ranch property owner to appeal a public entity’s or Native American tribe’s determination of responsibility pursuant to Section 48102.

(c) The regulations adopted under this section shall require the applicant public entity or Native American tribe to certify to both of the following:

(1) That the public entity or Native American tribe is the only applicant for funding under the program for any particular farm or ranch property.

(2) That the owner of the farm or ranch property is not responsible for the illegal disposal of the solid waste.

(3) That the public entity or Native American tribe has in place a program that is sufficient to prevent future incidents of illegal solid waste disposal.

(d) If a public entity or Native American tribe denies a grant application, it shall notify the farm or ranch property owner in writing as to why the application was denied.

(e) Nothing in this section is intended to prevent a farm or ranch property owner from receiving reimbursement for solid waste cleanup or abatement costs under the grant program or pursuant to any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 628, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48104.

Each year, as part of the annual report required to be submitted pursuant to Section 40507, the board shall report to the Governor and the Legislature on all of the following:

(a) Actions the board has taken under the grant program.

(b) The costs and effectiveness in cleaning up and abating solid waste illegally disposed of on farm and ranch property.

(c) The number of sites cleaned up and abated in each county.

(d) The number of participant cities, counties, districts, and Native American tribes, and the sites cleaned up and abated through those cities, counties, districts, and Native American tribes.

(e) The types of solid waste cleaned up and abated.

(f) The number of sites not approved for the grant program, and the reasons for that disapproval.

(g) The types of property on which solid waste has been cleaned up and abated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 628, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48105.

All solid waste collected as a result of cleanup or abatement under the grant program shall be recycled or reused to the maximum extent feasible and cleanup or abatement activities shall be conducted in compliance with existing laws governing the handling of solid wastes, hazardous wastes, liquid wastes, or medical wastes, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 628, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

48106.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to relieve any party who is responsible for the generation or illegal deposition of the solid waste from liability for removal costs if the party can be identified. Farm or ranch property owners whose property is the subject of solid waste cleanup or abatement under this chapter and who are not responsible for the generation or deposition of the solid waste shall not be subject to any cost recovery action for cleanup or abatement costs borne by public entities or Native American tribes or the board under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 628, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Other Provisions [48500. - 48502.]

48500.

If any provisions of this division or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this division which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application thereof, and to this end the provisions of this division are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

48501.

In any civil action brought pursuant to this division in which injunctive relief is sought, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove at any stage of the proceeding that irreparable damage will occur if the injunctive relief is not granted, or that the remedy at law is inadequate, and any form of injunctive relief shall be granted without those allegations and without that proof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

48502.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the powers and duties of the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code, including those concerning the issuance of permits for hazardous waste disposal sites, enforcement activities related to the handling, transportation, storage, use, processing, and disposal of hazardous wastes, and the development of programs for the recycling and recovery of resources from hazardous wastes, shall not be assumed or duplicated by the board pursuant to its responsibilities, powers, and duties provided in this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. California Oil Recycling Enhancement [48600. - 48691.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings [48600. - 48600.]

48600.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) The problem posed by used oil disposal requires a comprehensive, statewide response, including, but not limited to, eliminating illegal disposal, reducing landfill disposal of used oil, reducing pollution from stormwater runoff, recycling of used oil into new uses, and the promotion of secondary markets for recycled oil products.

(b) That the improper or illegal disposal of used oil, often mixed with other solid waste, is a potential source of stormwater pollution and that environmental education and mitigation efforts regarding proper management of used oil and oil byproducts is within the purposes of this chapter.

(c) California currently generates about 161 million gallons of used lubricating and industrial oil each year, and only about 50 percent of that oil is recycled.

(d) The scarcity of used oil collection centers and programs, and the charges imposed on consumers for recycling used oil, create economic disincentives for recycling that could be addressed through a recycling incentive program.

(e) Used oil represents a valuable state resource that should be reclaimed and recycled whenever possible. An abundance of used oil recycling alternatives exist that have been demonstrated to be environmentally safe. These alternatives need to be promoted in order to achieve the maximum use of used oil and prevent damage to the environment.
